Hawaii statutes.
§667-32 Affidavit after
public sale; contents. (a) After the public sale is held, the foreclosing
mortgagee shall sign an affidavit under penalty of perjury:

(1) Stating that the power of sale
foreclosure was made pursuant to the power of sale provision in the mortgage;

(2) Stating that the power of sale
foreclosure was conducted as required by this part;

(3) Summarizing what was done by the
foreclosing mortgagee;

(4) Attaching a copy of the recorded notice
of default and intention to foreclose;

(5) Attaching a copy of the last public
notice of the public sale;

(6) Referencing the document number of the
affiliate statement filed at the bureau of conveyances as required under
section 667-58; and

(7) Stating the date of filing and any
relevant referencing information assigned by the division of financial
institutions to the statement filed with the commissioner of financial
institutions of the mortgage servicer affiliate statement as required under
section 454M-5(b)(5)(F).

(b)
The recitals in the affidavit required under subsection (a) may, but need not,
be substantially in the following form:

"(1) I am duly authorized to represent or act
on behalf of ____________________ (name of mortgagee) ("foreclosing
mortgagee") regarding the following power of sale foreclosure. I am
signing this affidavit in accordance with the power of sale foreclosure process (Chapter 667, Part II, Hawaii Revised Statutes);

(2) The foreclosing mortgagee is a mortgagee
as defined in section 667-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, conducting
a power of sale foreclosure;

(3) The power of sale foreclosure is of a
mortgage made by ____________________ (name of mortgagor)
("mortgagor"), dated ____________________, and recorded in the
____________________ (bureau of conveyances or office of the assistant
registrar of the land court) as ____________________ (recordation
information). The mortgaged property is located at: ____________________
(address or description of location) and is identified by tax map key number:
____________________. The legal description of the mortgaged property,
including the certificate of title or transfer certificate of title number if
registered in the land court, is attached as Exhibit
"A". The name of the borrower, if different from the mortgagor, is
____________________ ("borrower");

(4) Pursuant to the power of sale provision
of the mortgage, the power of sale foreclosure was conducted as required by the
power of sale foreclosure law. The following is a summary of what was done:

(A) A notice of default and intention to
foreclose was served on the mortgagor, the borrower, and the following person:
____________________. The notice of default and intention to foreclose was
served on the following date and in the following manner: ____________________;

(B) The date of the notice of default and
intention to foreclose was ____________________ (date). The deadline in the
notice for curing the default was ____________________ (date), which deadline
date was at least sixty days after the date of the notice;

(C) The notice of default and intention to
foreclose was recorded before the deadline date in the ____________________
(bureau of conveyances or office of the assistant registrar of the land
court). The notice was recorded on ____________________ (date) as document no.
____________________. A copy of the recorded notice is attached as Exhibit
"1";

(D) The default was not cured by the deadline
date in the notice of default and intention to foreclose;

(E) A public notice of the public sale was initially
published in the classified section of the ____________________, in accordance
with section 667-27(d), Hawaii Revised Statutes, once each week for three
consecutive weeks on the following dates: ____________________. A copy of the
affidavit of publication for the last public notice of the public sale is
attached as Exhibit "2". The date of the public sale was
____________________ (date). The last publication was not less than fourteen
days before the date of the public sale;

(F) The public notice of the public sale was
sent to the mortgagor, to the borrower, to the state director of taxation, to
the director of finance of the county where the mortgaged property is located,
and to the following: ____________________. The public notice was sent on the
following dates and in the following manner: ____________________. Those
dates were after the deadline date in the notice of default and intention to
foreclose, and those dates were at least sixty days before the date of the
public sale;

(G) The public notice of the public sale was
posted on the mortgaged property or on such other real property of which the
mortgaged property is a part on ____________________ (date). That date was at
least sixty days before the date of the public sale;

(H) A public sale of the mortgaged property
was held on a business day during business hours on: ____________________
(date), at ____________________ (time), at the following location:
____________________. The highest successful bidder was ____________________
(name) with the highest successful bid price of $____________________; and

(I) At the time the public sale was held, the
default was not cured and there was no circuit court foreclosure action pending
in the circuit where the mortgaged property is located; and

(5) This affidavit is
signed under penalty of perjury."

[L 1998, c 122, pt of §1; am
L 2011, c 48, §30; am L 2012, c 182, §22; am L 2015,
c 62, §7]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next